Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20252-5003
Nebraska Aquaculture Board; created; members; terms; expenses; termination.

There is hereby created the Nebraska Aquaculture Board. The board shall consist of (1) one employee of the commission who is familiar with aquatic disease, appointed by the secretary of the commission, (2) one employee of the department appointed by the director, (3) three aquaculturists, appointed by the Governor, and (4) a representative of an industry or product which is related to or used in aquaculture, appointed by the Governor. The board shall elect from its members a chairperson. The terms of the members of the board shall be three years, except that the terms of the initial aquaculturist members of the board appointed by the Governor shall be staggered so that one member is appointed for a term of one year, one for a term of two years, and one for a term of three years, as determined by the Governor. Members appointed under subdivisions (3) and (4) of this section shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

The Nebraska Aquaculture Board terminates on July 1, 2026.

Laws 1993, LB 830, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 1165, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 405, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB334, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 12;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 6.
July 1, 2026